src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
Aix PropMasc "Aix" ;
Alixandre+Prop:Alixandr MC2 "Alexander" ;
amant MC1a "beloved, friend" ;
    ame:alme FC1 "soul, somebody" ;
amie FC1 "friend (female), Miss (in 'bele amie')" ;
    amor:amour FC2 "love" ;
ancessor MC3 "ancestor" ;
Angleterre PropFem "England" ; ! Verify gender
    Angleterre:Engleterre PropFem "England" ;
ante:ant FC3 "aunt, foster mother" ; ! separate meaning in Latin?
antif MC1a "ancient man" ;
    aoust:août NIndecM "August (month)" ;
    argent:argens NIndecM "silver" ;
    art:art FC2 "science, knowledge" ;
asn MC1b ;
Aude+Prop:Aud FC3 "Aude" ;
    autre:altre FC1 "the other __" ;
aversier MC1a "adversary, the devil" ;
avril NIndecM "April" ;
Aymes+Prop:Aymon MC3 "Aymes" ;
baron MC3 "lord, husband" ;
bataille FC1 "battle" ;
Berinus PropMasc "Berinus" ;
bers NIndecM "cradle, crib" ;
Berte+Prop:Bert FC3 "Bertha" ;
    besoing:besoi%{N%}e MC1a "need" ;
Blere+Prop:Bler FC3 "the cow Blere" ;
Bourgongne PropMasc "Bourgogne" ;
Bretaingne PropFem "Brittany" ;
    Bretaingne:Bretaigne PropFem "Brittany" ;
bricon MC3 "rogue, fool" ;
cause FC1 "cause, case" ;
chapitre:chapitr MC2 "chapter" ;
char NIndecF "flesh, meat" ;
    char:chair NIndecF "flesh, meat" ;
    char:charn NIndecF "flesh, meat" ;
Charles+Prop:Charlon MC3 "Charles" ;
    Charles+Prop:Carlon MC3 "Charles" ;
Chartres PropMasc "Chartres" ; ! Verify gender
chastel MC1a "castle" ;
    chastellet:chastelet NIndecM ;
cheval: Cheval "horse" ;
chien MC1a "dog" ;
ciel: Ciel "heaven" ;
clamor FC2 "clamour" ;
combat MC1a "fight, combat" ;
    compaignie:compagnie FC1 "company, group" ;
compaignon MC3 "companion" ;
compere:comper MC2 "friend, crony" ;
confession FC2 "confession, recognition, proclamation" ;
conte MC3 "count" ;
    conte:comte MC3 "count" ;
    corage:coraige MC1a "the heart (seat of consciousness, emotion, and reason)" ;
    cors:corps NIndecM "body" ;
    cort:court FC2 "court" ;
Crathor PropMasc "Crathor" ; ! Verify gender
    Crist:Christ PropMasc "Christ" ;
crois NIndecF "cross" ;
    crois:croix NIndecF "cross" ;
curé MC1a "priest" ;
    désir:désire MC1a "desire, wish, asperation, envy, desired thing" ;
Dieu: Dieu "god" ;
dol: Dol "suffering, pain, lamentation" ;
dos NIndecM "back, spine, rear side, part of weapon" ;
doute FC1 "doubt, uncertainty, fear, worry" ; ! Check class
    eaue:eau FC2 "water" ;
empereor MC3 "emperor" ;
    empereor:empereur MC3 "emperor" ;
Eneas PropMasc "Aeneas" ;
enfant:enfan%{T%} MC3 "child, youth" ;
eschipre:eschipr MC2 "sailor" ;
escu:escu%{T%} MC1a "shield" ;
Espaigne PropFem "Spain" ;
espee FC1 "sword" ;
Eve+Prop:Ev FC3 "Eve" ;
    fait:fe%{T%} MC1a "fact, deed, manner of doing" ; ! Verify
fei FC2 "faith" ;
feis NIndecF  "time" ;
fiance FC1 "confidence, trust, that which can be relied on" ;
fil: Fil "son" ;
Flandres PropFem "Flanders" ; ! Verify gender
flor FC2 "flower" ;
Fortune PropFem "idea/symbol/character of luck, chance, fortune" ;
Fouques PropMasc "Fouques" ;
francais NIndecM "frenchman" ;
France PropFem "France" ;
frere:frer MC2 "brother" ;
    frere:frier MC2 "brother" ;
Fresne PropFem "Fresne, heroine of a lay by Marie de France" ;
garçon MC3 "boy, servant" ;
genre:genr MC2 "son-in-law" ;
gent:gen Gent "race, people" ;
Gieffroy PropMasc  "Jeffrey" ;
gloire FC1 "glory" ;
gloton MC3 "glutton, wretch" ;
Gui+Prop:Guion MC3 "Guy" ;
histoire:%{H%}%{I%}stoire FC1 "history, story, tale" ;
    hom:hon MC1a "man" ;
honor:%{H%}on%>or FC2 "honor" ;
Jehannin PropMasc "Jehannin" ;
    Jerusalem:Jherusalem PropMasc "Jerusalem" ; ! Verify gender
jeudi NIndecM "Thursday" ;
    Jhesu:Jhesus PropMasc "Jesus" ;
    Jhesu:Jesus PropMasc "Jesus" ;
Jouvencel PropMasc "Jouvencel (title? name?)" ;
    juin:jun NIndecM "June" ;
lance FC1 "lance (weapon)" ;
larron MC3 "thief" ;
lei FC2 "law" ;
lez MC1a "side, flank" ;
livre:livr MC2 "book" ;
lundi NIndecM "Monday" ;
maison FC2 "house" ;
maistre:maistr MC2 "master" ;
Marie+Prop:Mari FC3 "Mary" ;
mars NIndecM "March" ;
merveille FC1 "marvel, wonder" ;
    mer:mar FC2 "sea" ;
mestier MC1a "job, occupation" ;
    Michiel:Michel PropMasc "Michael" ;
mois:mo%{I%}s NIndecM "month" ;
monseigneur: Monseigneur "my lord (honorific)" ;
necessité FC1 "necessity" ; ! Verify
nevo:nevo%{T%} MC3 "nephew" ;
niece:nieç FC3 "niece" ;
Noël PropFem "Christmas" ;
    Noël PropMasc "Christmas" ;
nom: Nom "name" ;
nombre:nombr MC2 "number" ;
none:non FC3 "nun" ;
nuit:nu%{I%}%{T%} FC2 "night" ;
ome MC3 ;
Orléans PropFem "Orleans region" ; ! Verify gender
Orne+Prop:Orn FC3 "Orne (River)" ;
pain MC1a "bread, food" ;
pais:païs NIndecM "country" ;
paix:pais NIndecF "peace" ;
    paix:paix NIndecF "peace" ;
paor FC2 "fear" ; ! esp. "avoir paor"
parastre:parastr MC2 "stepfather" ;
    Pasques PropFem "Passover, Easter" ;
pastor MC3 "shepherd" ;
pechie:pechié%{T%} FC2 "sin" ;
Pedre+Prop:Pedr MC2 ;
pere:per MC2 "father" ;
personne FC1 "person, character" ;
pied: Pied "foot" ;
Pinte+Prop:Pint FC3 "the hen Pinte" ;
pis NIndecM "chest (seat of the heart)" ;
Pollinicés PropMasc "Pollinicés" ;
présence FC1 "presence (in a location), present moment" ;
provoire:provei%{D%}re MC3 "priest" ;
pueple MC1a "people" ;
pute:put FC3 "harlot" ;
raison FC2 "discourse, speech, reason, justification" ;
Reson PropFem "Resson" ;
    Reson:Resson PropFem "Resson" ;
Rome PropFem "Rome" ;
    Rome:Romme PropFem "Rome" ;
rue FC1 "road, path" ;
saison FC2 "season" ;
samedi:sem%>edi NIndecM "Saturday" ;
Samuel PropMasc "Samuel" ; 
seignor: Seignor "lord" ;
    septembre:setembre NIndecM "September" ;
    serment:serement MC1a "oath" ;
    seror:serour FC1 "sister" ;
taian:tai FC3 "grandmother, great-aunt" ;
    tens:temps NIndecM "time, times, weather" ;
Thomas PropMasc "Thomas" ;
    tor:torn FC2 "tower" ;
Trinité:trinité%{T%} PropFem "the Trinity" ;
    Trinité:triniteit PropFem "the Trinity" ;
varlet:varle%{T%} MC1a "young man, boy, servant" ;
verité:verité%{T%} FC2 "truth" ;
vers NIndecM "verse, song" ;
vespre:vespr MC2 "evening" ;
Vierge PropFem "the Virgin (Mary)" ;
voie FC1 "way, path" ;
voiz:vois NIndecF "voice" ;
    voiz:voix NIndecF "voice" ;
